apertium-tg-fa.fa.metadix
    <!--  -->
    <pardef n="پیشوا__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__یی"/>
        <par n="S__ه"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
      <!-- plural with (ها), entry with ZWNJ -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>‌ها</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__یی"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
      <!-- plural with (ها), entry without ZWNJ -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ها</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__یی"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
      <!-- plural with (ان) -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>یان</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__ی"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!--  -->
    <pardef n="پرند/ه__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ه</l>
          <r>ه<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__ای"/>
        <par n="S__ه"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
      <!-- plural with (ها), entry with ZWNJ -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ه‌ها</l>
          <r>ه<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__یی"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
      <!-- plural with (ها), entry without ZWNJ -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>هها</l>
          <r>ه<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__یی"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
      <!-- plural with (ان), entry with ZWNJ -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ه‌گان</l>
          <r>ه<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__ی"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
      <!-- plural with (ان), entry without ZWNJ -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>گان</l>
          <r>ه<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__ی"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!--  -->
    <pardef n="اجسام__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__ی"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!--  -->
    <pardef n="بابک__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!--  -->
    <pardef n="هنوز__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!--  -->
    <pardef n="بزرگ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__ه"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>‌تر</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__ه"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>‌ترین</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__ه"/>
      </e>
      <!-- entradas without ZWNJ analyse only -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>تر</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ترین</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l><b/>تر</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l><b/>ترین</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!--  -->
    <pardef n="اوه__ij">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="ij"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- VERBS pardefs -->
    <pardef n="zwnj_or_space" >
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>‌</l>
          <r>‌</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l> </l>
          <r> </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="space_or_zwnj" >
      <e>
        <p>
          <l> </l>
          <r> </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>‌</l>
          <r>‌</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
<!-- New prefix part -->
		<pardef n="P__ن">
			<e>
				<p>
					<l>ن</l>
					<r>ن<s n="neg"/><j/></r>
				</p>
			</e>
			<e r="LR">
				<p>
					<l>ن</l>
					<r>ن<s n="neg"/><j/></r>
				</p>
			</e>
			<!-- Passthrough -->
			<e>
				<p>
					<l/>
					<r/>
				</p>
			</e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="P__jnjprefixes">
			<e>
				<par n="P__ن"/>
				<p>
					<l>می‌</l>
					<r>می<s n="me"/><j/></r>
				</p>
			</e>
			<e r="LR">
				<par n="P__ن"/>
				<p>
					<l>می</l>
					<r>می<s n="me"/><j/></r>
				</p>
			</e>
			<e r="LR">
				<par n="P__ن"/>
				<p>
					<l>می<b/></l>
					<r>می<s n="me"/><j/></r>
				</p>
			</e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="P__njprefixes">
			<e>
				<par n="P__jnjprefixes"/>
				<p>
					<l/>
					<r/>
				</p>
			</e>
			<!-- Passthrough -->
			<e>
				<p>
					<l/>
					<r/>
				</p>
			</e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="P__jjprefixes"><!--just joining -->
		<!-- Has been intended for prefixes might need ی when adding to a vowel begining word-->
			<e r="LR"> <!-- We need an extra bi part for manipulating bi for present time. with bi is more usaul in that usage.-->
				<par n="P__ن"/>
				<p>
					<l>ب</l>
					<r>ب<s n="bi"/><j/></r>
				</p>
			</e>
			<e>
				<p>
					<l>ن</l>
					<r>ن<s n="neg"/><j/></r>
				</p>
			</e>
    </pardef>
		<pardef n="P__jprefixes"><!-- Has been intended for prefixes might need ی when adding to a vowel begining word-->
<!-- We need an extra bi part for manipulating bi for present time. with bi is more usaul in that usage.-->
			<e>
			<par n="P__jjprefixes"/>
				<p>
					<l/>
					<r/>
				</p>
			</e>
			<!-- Passthrough -->
			<e>
				<p>
					<l/>
					<r/>
				</p>
			</e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="P__prefixes"><!-- when prefix -->
			<e>
				<par n="P__njprefixes" />
				<p>
					<l/>
					<r/>
				</p>
			</e>
			<e >
				<par n="P__jprefixes" />
				<p>
					<l/>
					<r/>
				</p>
			</e>
			<!-- Passthrough -->
			<e>
				<p>
					<l/>
					<r/>
				</p>
			</e>
		</pardef>
<!-- New prefix part end -->
    <pardef n="Pjj__imp__prefixes" > <!--just joining -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ب</l>
          <r>ب<s n="bi"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ن</l>
          <r>ن<s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="P__imp__prefixes" >
      <e>
        <par n="Pjj__imp__prefixes" />
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r/>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Passthrough -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r/>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- conjucation -->
    <pardef n="V__چشید/ن__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یم</l>
          <r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>م</l>
          <r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ید</l>
          <r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ی</l>
          <r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ند</l>
          <r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ید</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="اسلامشهر"><i>اسلامشهر</i><par n="بابک__np"/></e>
    <e lm="المنار"><i>المنار</i><par n="بابک__np"/></e>
    <e lm="برلین"><i>برلین</i><par n="بابک__np"/></e>
    <e lm="تالش"><i>تالش</i><par n="بابک__np"/></e>
    <e lm="حسین"><i>حسین</i><par n="بابک__np"/></e>
    <e lm="رجوی"><i>رجوی</i><par n="بابک__np"/></e>
    <e lm="سپهرنوش"><i>سپهرنوش</i><par n="بابک__np"/></e>
    <e lm="شوروی"><i>شوروی</i><par n="بابک__np"/></e>
    <e lm="کانادا"><i>کانادا</i><par n="بابک__np"/></e>
    <e lm="میرحسین"><i>میرحسین</i><par n="بابک__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ویکتور"><i>ویکتور</i><par n="بابک__np"/></e>
    <e lm="مبتلا"><i>مبتلا</i><par n="پیشوا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="نانوا"><i>نانوا</i><par n="پیشوا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آغا"><i>آغا</i><par n="پیشوا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بینا"><i>بینا</i><par n="پیشوا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بنبادگرا"><i>بنبادگرا</i><par n="پیشوا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پیشوا"><i>پیشوا</i><par n="پیشوا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="دارا"><i>دارا</i><par n="پیشوا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کارفرما"><i>کارفرما</i><par n="پیشوا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پاسخگو"><i>پاسخگو</i><par n="پیشوا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="دانشجو"><i>دانشجو</i><par n="پیشوا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="سودجو"><i>سودجو</i><par n="پیشوا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مددجو"><i>مددجو</i><par n="پیشوا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="افکنده"><i>افکند</i><par n="پرند/ه__n"/></e>
    <e lm="امامزاده"><i>امامزاد</i><par n="پرند/ه__n"/></e>
    <e lm="باخته"><i>باخت</i><par n="پرند/ه__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بازنده"><i>بازند</i><par n="پرند/ه__n"/></e>
    <e lm="برگزیده"><i>برگزید</i><par n="پرند/ه__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بنده"><i>بند</i><par n="پرند/ه__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پناهنده"><i>پناهند</i><par n="پرند/ه__n"/></e>
    <e lm="حشره"><i>حشر</i><par n="پرند/ه__n"/></e>
    <e lm="رفته"><i>رفت</i><par n="پرند/ه__n"/></e>
    <e lm="فرستاده"><i>فرستاد</i><par n="پرند/ه__n"/></e>
    <e lm="گرداننده"><i>گردانند</i><par n="پرند/ه__n"/></e>
    <e lm="نوازنده"><i>نوازند</i><par n="پرند/ه__n"/></e>
    <e lm="اخبار"><i>اخبار</i><par n="اجسام__n"/></e>
    <e lm="اساطیر"><i>اساطیر</i><par n="اجسام__n"/></e>
    <e lm="اعراب"><i>اعراب</i><par n="اجسام__n"/></e>
    <e lm="امتیازاتی"><i>امتیازاتی</i><par n="اجسام__n"/></e>
    <e lm="اولیای"><i>اولیای</i><par n="اجسام__n"/></e>
    <e lm="تزیینات"><i>تزیینات</i><par n="اجسام__n"/></e>
    <e lm="حواس"><i>حواس</i><par n="اجسام__n"/></e>
    <e lm="شرکای"><i>شرکای</i><par n="اجسام__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کارایان"><i>کارایان</i><par n="اجسام__n"/></e>
    <e lm="معادن"><i>معادن</i><par n="اجسام__n"/></e>
    <e lm="نفوس"><i>نفوس</i><par n="اجسام__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ازطرف"><i>ازطرف</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="آنچنان"><i>آنچنان</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="آنوقت"><i>آنوقت</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="بحمدالله"><i>بحمدالله</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="بلندتر"><i>بلندتر</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="حدود"><i>حدود</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="درکشور"><i>درکشور</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="طرفدارانه"><i>طرفدارانه</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="گرایانه"><i>گرایانه</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="منصفانه"><i>منصفانه</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="وگوهای"><i>وگوهای</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="اصلی"><i>اصلی</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="بجا"><i>بجا</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="تازه"><i>تازه</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="جنگی"><i>جنگی</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="دانمارکی"><i>دانمارکی</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="روسی"><i>روسی</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="شاعری"><i>شاعری</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="عریان"><i>عریان</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="گرمسیر"><i>گرمسیر</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="مستثنی"><i>مستثنی</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="نواخته"><i>نواخته</i><par n="بزرگ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="احسنت"><i>احسنت</i><par n="اوه__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="آخ"><i>آخ</i><par n="اوه__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="الا"><i>الا</i><par n="اوه__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="آه"><i>آه</i><par n="اوه__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="آهای"><i>آهای</i><par n="اوه__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="اوخ"><i>اوخ</i><par n="اوه__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="بارک الله"><i>بارک الله</i><par n="اوه__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="بلی"><i>بلی</i><par n="اوه__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="به"><i>به</i><par n="اوه__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="پچ‌پچ"><i>پچ‌پچ</i><par n="اوه__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="لبیک"><i>لبیک</i><par n="اوه__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="واخ"><i>واخ</i><par n="اوه__ij"/></e>
